Utah statutes.
20A-11-1102.   Paid advertisements permitted.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), an owner, publisher, editor,
reporter, agent, or employee of any newspaper or other periodical may not,
directly or indirectly, solicit, receive, or accept any payment, promise, or
compensation for influencing or attempting to influence any voting at any
election or primary by means of any printed matter in that newspaper or
periodical or through any means whatsoever.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person may not pay, promise to
pay, or in any manner compensate any  owner, publisher, editor, reporter,
agent, or employee of a newspaper or other periodical, directly or indirectly,
for influencing or attempting to influence any voting at any election or
primary  by means of any printed matter in that newspaper or periodical or
through any means whatsoever.
(3)  The prohibitions contained in this section do not apply if:
(a)  the matter is inserted in the newspaper or periodical as a paid
advertisement;
(b)  the matter is designated as a "paid advertisement" in the copy of the
advertisement; and
(c)  the compensation paid to the newspaper or periodical for inserting the
paid advertisement is not more than the regular rate charged by the newspaper
or periodical for that service.
